District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.14

District authorized to use certain land owned by United States for street purposes.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to use for street purposes 1,651 square feet of a tract of land known as parcel 17/93, 708 square feet of a tract of land known as parcel 18/52, and 380 square feet of a tract of land known as parcel 18/23, all for the widening of Reservoir Road, and to use for street purposes 23,779.63 square feet of a tract of land known as parcel 28/12 for the widening of Reservoir Road and Forty-fourth Street; and to use for street purposes a strip of land 60 feet wide containing 258,750 square feet, more or less, lying immediately northeasterly of the southwesterly boundary of a tract of land known as parcel 173/23 for the widening of South Dakota Avenue; and to use for street purposes 9,000 square feet, more or less, of a tract of land known as parcel 243/15 for the extension of Trenton Street and for the widening of 4th Street Southeast; and to use for street purposes 1,521.28 square feet of lot 802, square 1932, and 3,669.88 square feet of lot 837, square 1300, for the widening of Wisconsin Avenue, all as shown on maps designated as Street Extension Maps 1150 and 1154, and Surveyor’s Office Maps 1314 and 1373, on file in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia, all the above-described property herein authorized to be used for street purposes being owned by the United States of America.

Feb. 27, 1929, 45 Stat. 1341, ch. 353
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 7-126.
1981 Ed., § 7-126.